Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2212.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 33, chapter 9, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-1243.01, to read: START_STATUTE33-1243.01. Prohibited expenditures; lobbying; political activity NOTWITHSTANDING any PROVISION in the condominium documents, the association may not spend association monies on any organization that engages in lobbying as defined in section 41-1231 or that attempts to influence the outcome of an election as prescribed by title 16, chapter 6. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 33, chapter 16, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-1811.01, to read: START_STATUTE33-1811.01. Prohibited expenditures; lobbying; political activity NOTWITHSTANDING any PROVISION in the community documents, the association may not spend association monies on any organization that engages in lobbying as defined in section 41-1231 or that attempts to influence the outcome of an election as prescribed by title 16, chapter 6. END_STATUTE